Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General

§ 31-5-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Act Regulating Traffic on Highways”.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 162; C.S. 1945, § 60-762; W.S. 1957, § 31-77; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” as used in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Driving under the influence.—

In a case
involving two petitioners who were both convicted of driving under
the influence, the Supreme Court concluded that Laramie, Wyo., Mun.
Ordinance § 10.24.030(H) flouted the uniformly applicable statutes
governing traffic regulations and was therefore void. The City of
Laramie had created a minimum mandatory jail sentence for blood alcohol
content (BAC) results of 0.15% or more, which exceeded the minimum
punishment for the same BAC level under Wyoming law.
Wofford v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 59, 375 P.3d 740,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2016).

Applicability. —

Trial court properly instructed the jury and applied the “rules of the road” provisions in Wyo. Stat. Ann. Title 31, Chapter 5 to determine if the husband and the decedent were negligent in the operation of their snowmobiles on a highway closed to traffic during the winter and approved as a snowmobile trail; the legislature plainly considered snowmobiles as vehicles for the purpose of Chapter 5. Article Eight. Roberts v. Estate of Randall, 2002 WY 115, 51 P.3d 204,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 31-5-102.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise provided, as used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 2.

“Authorized emergency vehicles” means:

Vehicles of fire departments, fire patrols, game and fish law enforcement personnel, livestock board law enforcement personnel, brand inspectors, law enforcement agencies, public and private ambulances, medical rescue units and extrication rescue units;

Privately-owned vehicles used by members of a fire department or emergency service organization while performing or traveling to perform assigned fire fighting or emergency service duties are authorized emergency vehicles if:

Authorized in writing by the appropriate governing body of the city, town or county in which the emergency services organization is located;

Equipped with at least one (1) flashing red, white or amber light visible from the front of the vehicle; and

Equipped with a marker on the front of the vehicle indicating the department or organization with which affiliated.

A wrecker, tow truck or other vehicle equipped with a mechanical apparatus designed to hoist, pull or otherwise move wrecked, disabled or stalled motor vehicles:

While at the scene where the wrecked, disabled or stalled motor vehicle is located; and

When equipped with at least one (1) flashing red or red and blue lamp visible from five hundred (500) feet in front of and behind the vehicle, in addition to any other equipment or lights required or authorized by law.

“Bicycle” means every vehicle propelled solely by human power upon which any person may ride, having two (2) tandem wheels except scooters and similar devices;

“Bus” means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than ten (10) passengers and used for the transportation of persons and every motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation;

“Business district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway when within any six hundred (600) feet along the highway where there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings, which buildings occupy at least three hundred (300) feet of frontage on one (1) side or three hundred (300) feet collectively on both sides of the highway;

“Commission” means the Wyoming transportation commission;

“Controlled-access highway” means every highway, street or roadway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over the highway, street or roadway;

“Crosswalk” means:

That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway, and in the absence of a sidewalk on one (1) side of the roadway, that part of a roadway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the existing sidewalk at right angles to the centerline;

Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

“Department” or “highway department” means the department of transportation of the state of Wyoming;

“Driver” means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle;

“Explosives” means any chemical compounds, mixtures or devices, the primary or common purpose of which is to function by explosion, e.g., with substantially instantaneous release of gas and heat, unless the compounds, mixtures or devices are otherwise specifically classified. Explosives are classified as follows, commensurate with the degree of hazard:

Class A — detonating, or otherwise of maximum hazard, e.g. black powder;

Class B — rapid combustion rather than detonation, e.g. igniter;

Class C — minimum hazard, e.g. fireworks.

“Farm tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used exclusively as a farm implement for drawing implements of husbandry;

“Flammable liquid” means any liquid which has a flash point below one hundred degrees Fahrenheit (100° F) and has a vapor pressure not exceeding forty (40) pounds per square inch (absolute) at one hundred degrees Fahrenheit (100° F);

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 4.

“House trailer” means:

A trailer or semitrailer which is designed, constructed and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode or sleeping place (either permanently or temporarily) and is equipped for use as a conveyance on streets and highways; or

A trailer or a semitrailer whose chassis and exterior shell is designed and constructed for use as a house trailer, as defined in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, but which is used instead permanently or temporarily for advertising, sales display or promotion of merchandise or services, or for any other commercial purpose except the transportation of property for hire or the transportation of property for distribution by a private carrier.

“Implement of husbandry” means a vehicle designed and used exclusively for agricultural operations and only incidentally operated or moved upon a highway;

“Intersection” means:

The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2) highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict;

Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event such intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of two (2) roadways of such highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection;

The junction of an alley with a street or highway does not constitute an intersection.

“Laned roadway” means a roadway which is divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;

“Local authorities” means every county, municipal and other local board or body having authority to enact laws relating to traffic under the constitution and laws of this state;

“Metal tire” means every tire the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard nonresilient material;

“Moped” means a motor-driven cycle both with foot pedals to permit muscular propulsion by human power and with a motor which produces no more than two (2) brake horsepower and which is capable of propelling the vehicle at a maximum speed of no more than thirty (30) miles per hour on a level road surface. If an internal combustion engine is used, the displacement shall not exceed more than fifty (50) cubic centimeters and the moped shall have a power drive system that functions directly or automatically without clutching or shifting by the driver after the drive system is engaged. “Moped” does not include an electric bicycle;

“Motorcycle” means any motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, excluding off-road recreation vehicles as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K) and electric bicycles, but including a motor vehicle designed as a recreational vehicle primarily for off-road use to be ridden astride and to travel on four (4) wheels;

“Motor-driven cycle” means any motorcycle, including motor scooters and motorized bicycles having an engine with less than one hundred fifty (150) cubic centimeters displacement or with five (5) brake horsepower or less but does not include motorized skateboards or electric bicycles;

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle which is self-propelled except vehicles moved solely by human power, electric bicycles and motorized skateboards as defined by paragraph (a)(lxii) of this section;

“Official traffic-control devices” means all signs, signals, markings and devices not inconsistent with this act placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning or guiding traffic;

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle or if a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then the conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this act;

“Park” when prohibited, means the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading;

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot;

“Pedestrian vehicle” means any self-propelled conveyance designed, manufactured and intended for the exclusive use of persons with a physical disability, but in no case shall the vehicle:

Exceed forty-eight (48) inches in width.

and (C) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 155, § 2.

“Physical disability” means any bodily impairment which precludes a person from walking or otherwise moving about easily as a pedestrian;

“Pneumatic tire” means every tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load;

“Pole trailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, or pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads as poles, pipes or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections;

“Police officer” means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations;

“Private road or driveway” means every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;

“Railroad” means a carrier of persons or property upon cars, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails;

“Railroad sign or signal” means any sign, signal or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

“Railroad train” means a steam engine, electric or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails, except streetcars;

“Residence district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district when the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred (300) feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business;

“Right-of-way” means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under such circumstances of direction, speed and proximity as to give rise to danger of collision unless one grants precedence to the other;

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the sidewalk, berm or shoulder. In the event a highway includes two (2) or more separate roadways the term “roadway” as used herein shall refer to any such roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively;

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone;

“School bus” means every motor vehicle that complies with the color and identification requirements set forth in the most recent edition of “Minimum Standards for School Buses” and is used to transport children to or from school, but not including buses operated by common carriers in urban transportation of school children;

“Semitrailer” means every vehicle with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle;

“Sidewalk” means that portion of a street between curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines, intended for use of pedestrians;

“Snowmobile” means any mechanically driven vehicle of a type which utilizes sleet type runners, or skis or any endless belt tread or combination of these, designed primarily for operation over snow;

“Solid tire” means every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air for the support of the load;

“Stop” when required means complete cessation from movement;

“Stop, stopping or standing” when prohibited means any stopping or standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic-control sign or signal;

“Street or highway” means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained or if not publicly maintained, dedicated to public use when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel;

“Superintendent” means the director of the department of transportation;

“Through highway” means every highway or portion thereof on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right-of-way, and at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield the right-of-way to vehicles on the through highway in obedience to a stop sign, yield sign or other official traffic control devices, when the signs or devices are erected as provided in this act;

“Traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel;

“Traffic-control signal” means any device, whether manually, electrically or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and permitted to proceed;

“Trailer” means every vehicle with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle;

“Truck” means every motor vehicle designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation of property;

“Truck tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn;

“Urban district” means the territory contiguous to and including any public street or highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry or dwelling houses situated at intervals of less than one hundred (100) feet for a distance of a quarter of a mile or more;

“Vehicle” means every device, in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;

“This act” means W.S.

31-5-101

through

31-5-1601

;

“Emergency services” means fire fighting, first aid, medical services, rescue, transportation and other related activities necessary to ensure the health or safety of a person or property in imminent peril;

“Golf cart” means a motor vehicle which:

Has not less than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground;

Has an unladen weight of less than one thousand three hundred (1,300) pounds;

Is designed to be or is operated at not more than fifteen (15) miles per hour;

Is designed to carry golf equipment and not more than four (4) persons including the driver; and

Is being used to transport an occupant directly to, or from or on a golf course, or is being used for special events or circumstances authorized by the city, town or county.

“Motorized skateboard” means a self-propelled device which has a motor or engine, a deck on which a person may ride and at least two (2) wheels in contact with the ground and which is not otherwise defined in this act as a “motor vehicle”, “motorcycle”, “motor-driven cycle” or “pedestrian vehicle”;

“Multipurpose vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);

“Paved” means a roadway which is covered by hot-rolled asphalt or concrete but is not constructed solely of recycled asphalt;

“Unpaved” means a roadway which is not paved;

“Subdivision” means a portion of land for which a subdivision permit has been issued pursuant to W.S.

18-5-304

;

“Autocycle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(Q);

“Electric bicycle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxxiv).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 60-601; W.S. 1957, § 31-78; Laws 1961, ch. 104, § 1; 1963, ch. 41, §§ 1-5; 1971, ch. 112, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 89, § 2; ch. 102, § 1; 1982, ch. 3, § 1; 1983, ch. 18, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 138, § 2; ch. 183, § 1; 1986, ch. 88, § 2; 1989, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 241, §§ 3, 4; 1997, ch. 59, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 12, § 2; ch. 68, § 2; ch. 84, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2011, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, in (a)(xxiv), substituted “skateboards as defined by paragraph (a)(lxii)” for “skateboards and golf carts as defined by paragraph (a)(lxi)”; in (a)(lviii), deleted “and except golf carts as defined by paragraph (a)(lxi) of this section” at the end; added (lxiii); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(lxiv) through (a)(lxvi).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (a)(xxxvi).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(2)(C).

The 2017 amendment

, added (a)(lxvii).

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xxi), added “ ‘Moped’ does not include an electric bicycle,” in (a)(xxii) added “and electric bicycles,” in (a)(xxiii), added “or electric bicycles,” in (a)(xxiv), added “electric bicycles,” and added (a)(lxviii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

T-intersection comes within the definition of “intersection” found in subsection (a)(xvii).

Oroz v. Hayes, 598 P.2d 432,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1979).

“Through highway” definition in California was formerly similar to definition in this section.

Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

BIA officer. —

Under the terms of this section, although a Bureau of Indian Affairs officer is not a Wyoming “police officer,” he may be considered a “peace officer” for the purposes of enforcing Tribal traffic law and is accordingly authorized under §

31-7-116

to withhold licenses. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Highway. —

Defendant's private driveway, where she left her vehicle unattended with the keys in the ignition, following which the vehicle was stolen and was involved in an injury causing accident, was not a “street” or “highway” within the meaning of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-102(a)(xlix) because it was not open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.
Lucero v. Holbrook, 2012 WY 152, 288 P.3d 1228,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2012).

Cited

in

Colwell v. Anderson, 438 P.2d 448,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1968); Board of County Comm'rs v. Dunnegan, 884 P.2d 35,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 141

, 48 A.L.R.5th 941 (Wyo. 1994); Werner Enters. v. Brophy, 2009 WY 132, 218 P.3d 948,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Nov. 3, 2009).

§ 31-5-103.
Applicability of provisions to vehicles being operated upon highways.

The provisions of this act relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways except:

Where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section;

The provisions of W.S.

31-5-225

,

31-5-229

,

31-5-233

and

31-5-1101

through

31-5-1112

apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 60-602; W.S. 1957, § 31-79; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Private driveway. —

Defendant did not breach a duty under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-509

by leaving her vehicle unattended with the keys in the ignition, following which the vehicle was stolen and was involved in an injury causing accident, because her vehicle was parked in a private driveway and the statute applied only to vehicles standing unattended upon a highway.
Lucero v. Holbrook, 2012 WY 152, 288 P.3d 1228,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2012).

Highway construction vehicles. —

Operative effect of language of section governing meeting and passing of vehicles (§

31-5-202

) was not abrogated or affected by provision (§

31-5-105

) that Motor Vehicle Traffic Code should not apply to vehicles while actually engaged in work on surface of highway. Johnston v. Wortham Mach. Co., 60 Wyo. 301, 151 P.2d 89,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1944) (decided under prior law).

§ 31-5-104.
Obedience to authorized persons directing traffic.

No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any police officer, authorized flagman, or fireman with authority to direct, control or regulate traffic.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 60-605; W.S. 1957, § 31-81; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-105

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-105.
Applicability of provisions to drivers of public vehicles.

The provisions of this act applicable to the drivers of vehicles upon the highways shall apply to the drivers of all vehicles owned and operated by the United States, this state, or any county, city, town, special district or any other political subdivision of the state, except as provided in this section and subject to such specific exceptions as are set forth in this act with reference to authorized emergency vehicles.

Unless specifically made applicable, the provisions of this act except those contained in W.S.

31-5-225

,

31-5-229

,

31-5-233

and

31-5-236

do not apply to persons, motor vehicles and equipment while actually engaged in work upon a highway but shall apply to the persons and vehicles when traveling to or from work.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 60-605; W.S. 1957, § 31-82; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-106

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2009, ch. 69, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective
July 1, 2009, inserted “and

31-5-236

” in (b) and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Meeting and passing provisions not abrogated. —

Operative effect of language of section governing meeting and passing of vehicles (§

31-5-202

) was not abrogated or affected by this section's provision that Motor Vehicle Traffic Code should not apply to vehicles while actually engaged in work on surface of highway. Johnston v. Wortham Mach. Co., 60 Wyo. 301, 151 P.2d 89,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1944) (decided under prior law).

Snowplow operator not liable for death of motorist collidingwith plow. —

An employee of the highway commission operating a snowplow on a highway against traffic under directions of his superior was not liable for death of a motorist or damage to automobile because of a collision with the snowplow. Osborn v. Lawson, 374 P.2d 201,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1962).

§ 31-5-106.
Authorized emergency vehicles.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency call or when in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this act;

Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation;

Exceed the maximum speed limits so long as he does not endanger life or property;

Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.

This section does not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall this section protect the driver from the consequences of his reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Paragraphs (a)(ii) and (iii) of this section do not apply to a driver of a wrecker, tow truck or other vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(ii)(C).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 60-606; W.S. 1957, § 31-83; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-107

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2015 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added the exception in (a); added (c); and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(i), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Fire justifies excessive speed. —

Any actually existing fire is an emergency which justifies excessive speed and exempts municipality from liability for operation of fire apparatus at excessive speed. White v. City of Casper, 35 Wyo. 371, 249 P. 562,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1926).

§ 31-5-107.
Persons riding animals or driving animal-drawn vehicles.

Every person riding an animal or driving any animal-drawn vehicle upon a roadway is granted all the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this act except those provisions of this act which by their very nature can have no application.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 60-607; W.S. 1957, § 31-84; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-108

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

All drivers are held to same standard of care

— due care under the circumstances. Cervelli v. Graves, 661 P.2d 1032,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1983).

Section does not apply to one leading horses on a highway.

Wilcox v. Herbst, 75 Wyo. 289, 295 P.2d 755,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1956).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein from collision with runaway horse, or horse left unattended or untied in street, 49 ALR4th 653.

§ 31-5-108.
Local regulations.

The provisions of this act shall be applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all political subdivisions and municipalities therein. Local authorities may, however, adopt by ordinance, traffic regulations for all streets within their city limits and highways under their corporate jurisdiction and shall have the express authority to enforce the traffic regulations so adopted, by action in their respective local municipal courts.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 60-608; W.S. 1957, § 31-85; W.S. 1977,

31-5-109

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Driving under the influence.—

In a case
involving two petitioners who were both convicted of driving under
the influence, the Supreme Court concluded that Laramie, Wyo., Mun.
Ordinance § 10.24.030(H) flouted the uniformly applicable statutes
governing traffic regulations and was therefore void. The City of
Laramie had created a minimum mandatory jail sentence for blood alcohol
content (BAC) results of 0.15% or more, which exceeded the minimum
punishment for the same BAC level under Wyoming law.
Wofford v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 59, 375 P.3d 740,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

Fanning v. City of Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Colwell v. Anderson, 438 P.2d 448,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1968).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Authority of the State and Local Governments to Legislate in Regard to Motor Vehicles,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 247 (1964).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

§ 31-5-109.
General powers of local authorities.

This act does not prevent local authorities with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of the police power from:

Regulating or prohibiting stopping, standing or parking;

Regulating traffic by means of police officers, authorized flagmen or official traffic-control signals;

Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways;

Designating particular highways or roadways for use by traffic moving in one (1) direction as authorized by W.S.

31-5-208

;

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 2.

Designating any highway as a through highway or designating any intersection or junction of roadways as a stop or yield intersection or junction;

Regulating the operation of bicycles and electric bicycles and requiring the registration and licensing of bicycles and electric bicycles, including the requirement of a registration fee;

Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles or specified types of vehicles;

Altering or establishing speed limits as authorized by this act;

Requiring written accident reports as authorized by W.S.

31-5-1106

;

Designating no-passing zones as authorized in W.S.

31-5-207

;

Prohibiting or regulating the use of controlled-access roadways by any class or kind of traffic as authorized in W.S.

31-5-213

;

Prohibiting or regulating the use of heavily traveled streets by any class or kind of traffic found to be incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic;

Establishing minimum speed limits as authorized by W.S. 31-5-304(b);

Designating and regulating traffic on play streets;

Regulating persons propelling push carts;

Regulating persons upon skates, coasters, sleds, motorized skateboards and other toy vehicles;

Adopting and enforcing such temporary or experimental regulations as may be necessary to cover emergencies or special conditions;

Prohibiting drivers of ambulances from exceeding maximum speed limits;

Adopting such other traffic regulations as are specifically authorized by this act.

No local authority shall erect or maintain any official traffic-control device at any location so as to require the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway unless approval in writing has first been obtained from the highway department.

No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraphs (a)(iv), (v), (vi), (viii), (ix), (x), (xiii) or (xv) of this section is effective until official traffic-control devices giving notice of the local traffic regulations are erected upon or at the entrances to the highway or part thereof affected as may be most appropriate.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 60-609; W.S. 1957, § 31-86; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-110

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 68, § 2; ch. 84, § 1; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vii), added "and electric bicycles" twice.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Power to establish through streets for use by commercial through trucks. —

The power of municipalities to establish through streets doubtless includes the power to establish through streets mainly for use by commercial through trucks, since the genus necessarily included every species. Blumenthal v. Cheyenne, 64 Wyo. 75, 186 P.2d 556,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1947) (decided under prior law).

Applied

in

Fanning v. City of Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)); Swisse v. City of Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Municipal establishment or operation of off-street public parking facilities, 8 ALR2d 373.

Construction and effect in civil actions of statute, ordinance or regulation requiring vehicles to be stopped or parked parallel with and not within certain distances of curb, 17 ALR2d 582.

Relation of use of parking meter funds to validity of ordinance as police regulation, or to invalidity of ordinance as unauthorized revenue measure, 83 ALR2d 625.

§ 31-5-110.
Limitations upon powers of local authorities; exceptions as to municipal authorities.

Except as otherwise provided, local authorities shall not require any person to pay any fee or license for the use or exclude any person from the free use of the public highways or in any other way regulate the operation of motor vehicles or their speed upon or use of the public highways. Local authorities may, within their legal corporate limits:

Regulate the operation of vehicles offered for hire, or forming a part of processions, assemblages or parades on public highways or public grounds;

Close for a reasonable time a specified highway for speed contests or races, with proper safety restrictions and regulations;

Exclude motor vehicles from any cemetery or burial ground; and

Exclude motor vehicles used solely for commercial purposes from any park or part of a park system.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 69, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 72-121; C.S. 1945, § 60-133; W.S. 1957, § 31-87; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-111

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1921, ch. 69, § 32, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Free use of streets subject to reasonable regulation. —

When this section refers to the free use of the streets, it but announces a rule long ago recognized, and must be construed with the limitation that it is subject to reasonable regulation. Blumenthal v. Cheyenne, 64 Wyo. 75, 186 P.2d 556,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1947).

Section does not bar ordinance regulating route of through truck traffic in city.

Blumenthal v. Cheyenne, 64 Wyo. 75, 186 P.2d 556,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 31-5-111.
Right of real property owners to prohibit or regulate public vehicular use; handicapped parking.

Nothing in this act prevents the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner, and not as matter of right, from prohibiting the use, or from requiring other or different or additional conditions than those specified in this act, or otherwise regulating use of the real property as determined by the owner.

With the approval of the board of county commissioners or the local governing body having jurisdiction, the real property owner may reserve parking spaces for the handicapped and erect signs in accordance with W.S. 31-5-501(b). The signs reserving parking spaces for the handicapped under this section shall be enforceable under W.S. 31-5-501(c) or any existing municipal ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality with jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 60-610; W.S. 1957, § 31-88; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-112

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1993, ch. 6, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).